California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 Procedure Act and shall not result in reactivation of any deactivated provider numbers during appeal. An applicant, provider, or billing agent that files an appeal pursuant to this section shall submit the written appeal along with all pertinent documents and all other relevant evidence to the director or to the director’s designee within 60 days of the date of notification of the department’s action. The director or the director’s designee shall review all of the relevant materials submitted and shall issue a decision within 90 days of the receipt of the appeal. The decision may provide that the action taken should be upheld, continued, or reversed, in whole or in part. The decision of the director or the director’s designee shall be final. Any further appeal shall be required to be filed in accordance with Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) No applicant whose application for enrollment as a provider has been denied pursuant to
 Section 14043.2, 14043.36, or 14043.4 may reapply for a period of three years from the date the application is denied. The three-year period shall commence upon the date of the denial notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 797, Sec. 20.   (SB 1529)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.7.

(a) The department may make unannounced visits to an applicant or to a provider for the purpose of determining whether enrollment, continued enrollment, or certification is warranted, or as necessary for the administration of the Medi-Cal program. If an unannounced site visit is conducted by the department for any enrolled provider, the provider shall permit access to any and all of their provider locations. If a provider fails to permit access for any site visit, the application shall be denied and the provider shall be subject to deactivation. At the time of the visit, the applicant or provider shall be required to demonstrate an established place of business appropriate and adequate for the services billed or claimed to the Medi-Cal program, as relevant to his or her scope of
 practice, as indicated by, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Being open and available to the general public.

(2) Having regularly established and posted business hours.

(3) Having adequate supplies in stock on the premises.

(4) Meeting all local laws and ordinances regarding business licensing and operations.

(5) Having the necessary equipment and facilities to carry out day-to-day business for his or her practice.

(b) An unannounced visit pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be prohibited with respect to clinics licensed under Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, clinics exempt from licensure under Section 1206 of
 the Health and Safety Code, health facilities licensed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and natural persons licensed or certified under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, the Osteopathic Initiative Act, or the Chiropractic Initiative Act, unless the department has reason to believe that the provider will defraud or abuse the Medi-Cal program or lacks the organizational or administrative capacity to provide services under the program.

(c) (1) Failure to remediate significant discrepancies in information provided to the department by the provider or significant discrepancies that are discovered as a result of an announced or unannounced visit to a provider, for purposes of enrollment, continued enrollment, or certification pursuant to subdivision (a) shall make the provider subject to temporary suspension from the Medi-Cal
 program, which shall include temporary deactivation of the provider’s number, including all business addresses used by the provider to obtain reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program. The director shall notify in writing the provider of the temporary suspension and deactivation of provider numbers, which shall take effect 15 days from the date of the notification. Notwithstanding Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code, proceedings after the imposition of sanctions in this subdivision shall be in accordance with Section 14043.65.

(2) A notice of temporary suspension issued pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include the following:

(A) A list of discrepancies required to be remediated.

(B) The timeframe in which a provider may demonstrate to the department that the discrepancies identified pursuant to subparagraph (A)
 have been remediated. The timeframe in which a provider may remediate discrepancies shall not be less than 60 days from the date the notice of temporary suspension is issued.

(3) If a provider who has received a notice of temporary suspension pursuant to paragraph (1) demonstrates to the department that the discrepancies identified pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) have been remediated and meets the standards of participation within the timeframe specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), the department shall lift the temporary suspension and shall notify the provider that the temporary suspension has been lifted and that he or she is eligible to receive Medi-Cal reimbursement for services provided after the date the temporary suspension was lifted.

(4) If a provider has received a site visit pursuant to this section that results in a notice of temporary
 suspension pursuant to paragraph (1), and the provider fails to remediate the discrepancies identified pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) within the timeframe specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), the department shall send the provider a notice stating that the provider will be removed from enrollment as a provider in the Medi-Cal program by operation of law based on failure to remediate the discrepancies identified in the notice of temporary suspension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 844, Sec. 1.   (SB 1315)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.75.

(a) The director may, in consultation with interested parties, by regulation, adopt, readopt, repeal, or amend additional measures to prevent or curtail fraud and abuse. Regulations adopted, readopted, repealed, or amended pursuant to this section shall be deemed emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division
 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). These emergency regulations shall be deemed necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Emergency regulations adopted, amended, or repealed pursuant to this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the director may, without taking regulatory action pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, implement, interpret, or make specific Sections 14043.15, 14043.25, 14043.26, 14043.27, 14043.28, 14043.29, 14043.341, and 14043.38 by means of a provider bulletin or similar instruction. The department shall notify and consult
 with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders in implementing, interpreting, or making specific those provisions described in this subdivision, including all of the following:

(1) Notifying provider representatives of the proposed action or change. The notice shall occur at least 10 business days prior to the meeting provided for in paragraph (2).

(2) Scheduling at least one meeting with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders to discuss the action or change.

(3) Allowing for written input regarding the action or change.

(4) Providing at least 30 days’ advance notice of the effective date of the action or change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 797, Sec. 23.   (SB 1529)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14044.

(a) The department may limit, for 18 months or less, the American Medical Association’s Current Procedural Terminology Fourth Edition (CPT-4) codes, the National Drug Codes (NDC), the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) codes, or codes established under Title II of the Health Insurance Portability & Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1320d et seq.) for which any provider may bill, or for which reimbursement to any person or entity may be made by, the Medi-Cal program or other health care programs administered by
 the department if either of the following conditions exist:

(1) The department determines, by audit or other investigation, that excessive services or billings, or abuse, has occurred, which may include the department’s discovery or determination that a claim was submitted for reimbursement under the Medi-Cal program for a nerve conduction test, electromyography, or procedures, tests, examinations, or other medical services that the department has specified requires a certain residency or board certification, but the records did not contain, or the person or entity submitting the claim for reimbursement did not have, the certificate or diploma required by Section 14170.11.

(2) The Medical Board of California or other licensing authority or a court of competent jurisdiction limits a licensee’s practice of medicine or the rendering of health care, and the limitation precludes the
 licensee from performing services that could otherwise be reimbursed by the Medi-Cal program or other health care programs administered by the department.

(b) The department may impose a limitation pursuant to subdivision (a) for one or more codes or any combination of codes after giving the provider notice of the proposed limitation and, if applicable, the opportunity to appeal pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) (1) A provider who receives notice of a proposed limitation based on paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall have 45 days from the date of notice to appeal the limitation by providing to the department reliable evidence that excessive services or billings, or abuse, did not occur.

(2) The department shall review the evidence and issue a decision within 45 days of receipt of the
 evidence.

(d) If a limitation is imposed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), it shall take effect on the 46th day after notice of the proposed limitation was given or, if the limitation is timely appealed, 15 days after the department gives the provider notice of its decision to impose the limitation. If a limitation is imposed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), it shall take effect 15 days after notice of the proposed limitation was given.

(e) If the department’s limitation could interfere with the provider’s or other prescriber’s ability to provide health care services to a beneficiary, the burden to transfer a patient’s care to another qualified person shall remain the responsibility of the licensee.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Abuse” has the same meaning as defined in Section 14043.1.

(2) “Administered by the department” means administered by the department or its agents or contractors.

(3) “Excessive services or billings” means an amount that is substantially in excess of what the department reasonably expects from the provider, based on data regarding the provider or other providers in the health care community who provide substantially similar services to a substantially similar patient population, that is available to the department from any source, including the department.

(4) “Licensee” means a person licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code.

(5) “Other prescriber” means that person who is not the primary or attending physician for a patient who is a beneficiary of the Medi-Cal program or other health care program administered by the department, and that person causes the department, or its agents or contractors, to provide reimbursement for a drug, device, medical service, or supply to the beneficiary.

(6) “Provider” has the same meaning as defined in Section 14043.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 228, Sec. 10.7.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.

(a) A provider shall not submit a reimbursement request to the Medi-Cal program containing a beneficiary’s social security number if the department has issued that beneficiary a Medi-Cal beneficiary identification card containing a beneficiary number with the issuance date included in that number.

(b) This section shall not apply to the submission of a request by a provider for beneficiary eligibility.

(c) In
 order to reduce medical fraud and the black market for stolen social security cards, the State Department of Health Care Services may establish an automated HIPAA-compliant system using HIPAA transactions whereby all providers can access a beneficiary’s identification card number for submitting reimbursement requests.

(d) When the provider makes a good faith effort to obtain a recipient’s beneficiary identification card number, this section shall not apply to the following types of services, or the following provider types, until the time that the department is able to establish a system described in subdivision (c):

(1) A hospital licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A long-term health care facility, as defined in Section 1418 of the Health
 and Safety Code.

(3) A primary care clinic that is licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Emergency medical transportation services.

(5) A hospital-based physician.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 246.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.4. Peer Support Specialist Certification Program [14045.10. - 14045.21.]

14045.10.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Peer providers in California provide individualized support, coaching, facilitation, and education to clients with mental health care needs and substance use disorders in a variety of settings. Yet, no statewide scope of practice, standardized curriculum, training standards, supervision standards, or certification protocol is available.

(b) The United States Department of Veterans Affairs and at least 48 states utilize standardized curricula and certification protocols for peer support services.

(c) The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) recognizes that
 the experiences of peer support specialists, as part of an evidence-based model of care, can be an important component in a state’s delivery of effective mental health and substance use disorder treatment. The CMS encourages states to offer comprehensive programs.

(d) A substantial number of research studies demonstrate that peer supports improve client functioning, increase client satisfaction, reduce family burden, alleviate depression and other symptoms, reduce homelessness, reduce hospitalizations and hospital days, increase client activation, and enhance client self-advocacy.

(e) Certification can increase the diversity and effectiveness of the behavioral health workforce through the use of peers with lived experience.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.11.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the peer support specialist certification program, established under this article, achieve all of the following:

(a) Support the ongoing provision of services for individuals experiencing mental health care needs, substance use disorder needs, or both, by certified peer support specialists.

(b) Support coaching, linkage, and skill building of individuals with mental health needs, substance use disorder needs, or both, and to families or significant support persons.

(c) Increase family support by building on the strengths of families and helping them achieve a better understanding of mental
 illness in order to help individuals achieve desired outcomes.

(d) Support collaboration with others providing care or support to the individual or family.

(e) Assist parents, families, and individuals in developing coping mechanisms and problem-solving skills in order to help individuals achieve desired outcomes.

(f) Promote skill building for individuals in the areas of socialization, recovery, self-sufficiency, self-advocacy, development of natural supports, and maintenance of skills learned in other support services.

(g) Encourage employment under the peer support specialist certification to reflect the culture, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender identity, mental health service experiences, and substance use disorder experiences of the
 individuals the peer support specialists serve.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.12.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Certification” means the activities related to the verification that an individual has met all of the requirements under this article and that the individual may provide peer support specialist services pursuant to this article.

(b) “Certified” means all federal and state requirements have been satisfied by an individual who is seeking designation under this article, including completion of curriculum and training requirements, testing, and agreement to uphold and abide by the code of ethics.

(c) “Code of ethics” means the standards to which a peer support specialist
 is required to adhere.

(d) “Core competencies” means the foundational and essential knowledge, skills, and abilities required for peer specialists.

(e) “Cultural competence” means a set of congruent behaviors, attitudes, and policies that come together in a system or agency that enables that system or agency to work effectively in cross-cultural situations. A culturally competent system of care acknowledges and incorporates, at all levels, the importance of language and culture, intersecting identities, assessment of cross-cultural relations, knowledge and acceptance of dynamics of cultural differences, expansion of cultural knowledge, and adaptation of services to meet culturally unique needs to provide services in a culturally competent manner.

(f) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care
 Services.

(g) “Peer support specialist” means an individual who is 18 years of age or older, who has self-identified as having lived experience with the process of recovery from mental illness, substance use disorder, or both, either as a consumer of these services or as the parent or family member of the consumer, and who has been granted certification under a county peer support specialist certification program.

(h) “Peer support specialist services” means culturally competent services that promote engagement, socialization, recovery, self-sufficiency, self-advocacy, development of natural supports, and identification of strengths. Peer support specialist services include, but are not limited to, prevention services, support, coaching, facilitation, or education that is individualized and is conducted by a certified peer support specialist.

(i) “Recovery” means a process of change through which an individual improves their health and wellness, lives a self-directed life, and strives to reach their full potential. This process of change recognizes cultural diversity and inclusion, and honors the different routes to resilience and recovery based on the individual and their cultural community.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.13.

By July 1, 2022, subject to Section 14045.19, the department shall do all of the following:

(a) Establish statewide requirements for counties, or an agency representing counties, to use in developing certification programs for the certification of peer support specialists.

(b) Define the qualifications, range of responsibilities, practice guidelines, and supervision standards for peer support specialists. The department may utilize best practice materials published by the federal Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and related notable experts in the field as a basis for development of these definitions.

(c) Determine curriculum and core competencies required for certification of an individual as a peer support specialist, including curriculum that may be offered in areas of specialization, including, but not limited to, transition-age youth, veterans, gender identity, sexual orientation, and any other areas of specialization identified by the department. Core-competencies-based curriculum shall include, at a minimum, training related to all of the following elements:

(1) The concepts of hope, recovery, and wellness.

(2) The role of advocacy.

(3) The role of consumers and family members.

(4) Psychiatric rehabilitation skills and service delivery, and addiction recovery principles, including
 defined practices.

(5) Cultural competence training.

(6) Trauma-informed care.

(7) Group facilitation skills.

(8) Self-awareness and self-care.

(9) Cooccurring disorders of mental health and substance use.

(10) Conflict resolution.

(11) Professional boundaries and ethics.

(12) Preparation for employment opportunities, including study and test-taking skills, application and résumé preparation, interviewing, and other potential requirements for employment.

(13) Safety and crisis planning.

(14) Navigation of, and referral to, other services.

(15) Documentation skills and standards.

(16) Confidentiality.

(d) Specify peer support specialist employment training requirements, including core-competencies-based training and specialized training necessary to become certified under this article, and require training to include people with lived experience as consumers and family members.

(e) Establish a code of ethics.

(f) Determine continuing education requirements for biennial certification renewal.

(g) Determine the process for initial certification issuance and biennial certification renewal.

(h) Determine a process for investigation of complaints and corrective action, including suspension and revocation of certification and appeals.

(i) Determine a process for an individual employed as a peer support specialist on January 1, 2022, to obtain certification under this article.

(j) Determine requirements for peer support specialist certification reciprocity between counties, and for peer support specialists from out of state.

(k) Seek any federal approvals, related to the statewide certification standards, that it deems necessary to implement this article. For any federal approvals that
 the department deems necessary related to the statewide certification standards, this article shall be implemented only if and to the extent that the department obtains those federal approvals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.14.

(a) Subject to department approval, a county, or an agency representing the county, may develop a peer support specialist certification program in accordance with this article and any standards established by the department. That county, or an agency representing that county, shall oversee and enforce the certification requirements developed pursuant to this article. To request department approval of the county peer support specialist program, a county, or an agency representing the county, shall do all of the following:

(1) Submit to the department a peer support specialist program plan describing how the peer support specialist program will meet all of the federal and state requirements for the certification and oversight of peer support
 specialists.

(2) Submit to periodic reviews conducted by the department to ensure adherence to all federal and state requirements.

(3) Submit annual peer support specialist program reports to the department.

(b) If a county chooses not to develop peer support specialist certification programs in accordance with this article, the county may fund peer programs to the extent those programs meet all requirements of the applicable funding source.

(c) The Legislature finds that peer support specialist certification is conducted at the state level in other states, but this section passes this responsibility to counties. Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature, the state shall fund the startup costs to implement this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.15.

(a) To receive a certification under this article, an applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Be at least 18 years of age.

(2) Possess a high school diploma or equivalent degree.

(3) Be self-identified as having experience with the process of recovery from mental illness or substance use disorder either as a consumer of these services or as the parent or family member of the consumer.

(4) Be willing to share their experience.

(5) Have a strong dedication to
 recovery.

(6) Agree, in writing, to adhere to a code of ethics.

(7) Successfully complete the curriculum and training requirements for a peer support specialist.

(8) Pass a certification examination approved by the department for a peer support specialist.

(b) To maintain certification under this article, a certified peer support specialist shall meet both of the following requirements:

(1) Adhere to the code of ethics and biennially sign an affirmation.

(2) Complete any required continuing education, training, and recertification requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.16.

This article does not authorize an individual who is certified pursuant to this article to diagnose an illness, prescribe medication, or provide clinical services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.17.

The department shall solicit stakeholder input that may include input from the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, peer support and family organizations, mental health services and substance use disorder treatment providers and organizations, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, and the California Behavioral Health Planning Council in implementing this article. Consultation shall include regular stakeholder meetings. The department may additionally conduct technical workgroups upon the request of stakeholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.18.

A participating county, or an agency representing a participating county, is authorized to establish a certification fee schedule for the purpose of supporting the activities associated with the ongoing administration of the peer support specialist certification program. Before the fee schedule may be implemented, the department shall review and either approve or disapprove the fee schedule of the participating county or an agency representing the participating county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.19.

(a) The department shall seek any federal waivers it deems necessary to establish a demonstration or pilot project for the provision of peer support services in counties that agree to participate and provide the necessary nonfederal share funding for the demonstration or pilot project. The demonstration or pilot project shall do all of the following:

(1) Include a peer support specialist certified pursuant to this article as a Medi-Cal provider type for purposes of the demonstration or pilot project.

(2) Include peer support specialist services as a distinct service type in counties that opt in to the demonstration or pilot project.

(3) Develop and implement one or more billing codes, reimbursement rates, and claiming requirements for peer support specialist services.

(b) (1) This section does not require a county to participate in a demonstration or pilot project pursuant to this section. A county that opts to participate in a demonstration or pilot project and provide the necessary nonfederal share funding shall be considered to do so voluntarily for purposes of all state and federal laws.

(2) A county that opts to participate in a demonstration or pilot project pursuant to this section agrees to fund the nonfederal share of any applicable expenditures through certified public expenditures or intergovernmental transfers in accordance with Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Each participating county
 shall certify that the local funds it uses to fund the nonfederal share of expenditures pursuant to this section qualify for federal financial participation pursuant to applicable federal Medicaid laws and any terms of federal approval, in the form and manner as required by the department.

(3) Demonstration or pilot projects developed and implemented pursuant to this section shall not constitute a mandate of a new program or higher level of service that has an overall effect of increasing the costs mandated by the 2011 realignment legislation for the counties that opt in to a demonstration or pilot project.

(4) General Fund moneys shall not be used to fund the nonfederal share of any expenditures made pursuant to a demonstration or pilot project under this section.

(c) This section shall be implemented only if and to
 the extent that the department obtains any necessary federal approvals, and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.20.

For the purpose of implementing this article, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid or negotiated basis, including contracts for the purpose of obtaining subject matter expertise or other technical assistance. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14045.21.

Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this article, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.6. Medi-Cal Conflict of Interest Law [14047. - 14047.7.]

14047.

(a) This article shall be known as the “Medi-Cal Conflict of Interest Law.”

It is the intent of the Legislature that provisions be made for disclosure of the interests of providers of service in the services, facilities, and organizations to which they refer Medi-Cal recipients so that it is possible to determine the extent to which conflicts of interests may exist because of such referrals.

It is the further intent of the Legislature that provision be made for the regulation of employment of present and former employees of state and local agencies responsible for the expenditure of funds under Medi-Cal so as to avoid the risk of conflicts of interests.

(b) As used in this article, the term “referral” means (1) the referral of a recipient by a provider of service to any other provider of service; (2) the placement of a recipient by a provider of service in any facility; or (3) the obtaining, requesting, ordering, or prescribing of services or supplies by a provider of service on behalf of a recipient from any other provider of service.

As used in this article, the term “immediate family” includes the spouse and children of the provider of service, the parents of the provider of service and their spouses, and the spouses of the children of the provider of service.

As used in this article, the term “state or local officer or employee who is responsible for the expenditure of substantial amounts of funds under Medi-Cal” means (1) the Director of the State Department of Health Care Services, and (2) those other state officers or employees, and those local officers
 or employees, who are determined by the director by regulation to be responsible for the expenditure of substantial amounts of funds under the California Medical Assistance Act and California’s State Plan under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

As used in this article, the term “substantial amounts of funds” shall have the meaning defined by the director by regulation. As used in this article, “judicial, quasi-judicial or other proceeding” shall have the meaning defined in Article 4 (commencing with Section 87400) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14030 by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 316.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 14047.7.    After repeal, see related provisions in Section 14022.)
-------------------------------------------

14047.5.

A payment under this chapter shall not be made to a provider of services or to any facility or organization in which a provider of service or the immediate family of the provider of service has a significant beneficial interest, for services rendered in connection with any referral of a recipient, unless there is on file with the director and the Advisory Health Council a statement of the nature and extent of such interest.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14031 by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 317.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 14047.7.    After repeal, see related provisions in Section 14022.)
-------------------------------------------

14047.6.

(a) A state or local officer or employee who is responsible for the expenditure of substantial amounts of funds under Medi-Cal, an individual who formerly was such an officer or employee, or a partner of such an officer or employee shall not commit any act, in connection with any activity concerning Medi-Cal, if the commission of such act by an officer or employee of the United States Government, an individual who was such an officer or employee, or a partner of such an officer or employee, in connection with any activity concerning the United States Government, would be prohibited by Section 207 or 208 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(b) Upon the petition of any interested person or party, a court or state
 administrative agency or any officer thereof in any judicial, quasi-judicial or other proceeding may, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, exclude any person found to be in violation of this section from further participation in any judicial, quasi-judicial or other proceeding then pending before such court, agency or officer.

(c) The prohibitions of this section do not apply to any person who left government service prior to the effective date of this section except that any such person who returned to government service on or after the effective date of this section shall be covered thereby.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14032 by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 318.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed in Section 14047.7.    After repeal, see related provisions in Section 14022.)
-------------------------------------------

14047.7.

This article shall remain in effect only until Section 1902(a)(4)(C) of the federal Social Security Act, as added by Public Law 95-559 is repealed, held invalid by a court of appeal, or otherwise made inoperative, and as of such date is repealed.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14033 by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 319.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed conditionally as prescribed by its own provisions.    After repeal, see related provisions in Section 14022.   Note: Repeal affects Article 1.6, commencing with Section 14047.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [14050. - 14068.]

14050.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14050.1.

For purposes of this chapter, “categorically needy person” means a person whose coverage is mandatory under Title XIX of the Social Security Act including, but not limited to, the individuals covered pursuant to Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 735, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14050.2.

For the purposes of this chapter “aid” means financial assistance provided to or in behalf of needy persons under the provisions of Chapters 2 (commencing with Section 11200), 3 (commencing with Section 12000), and 5 (commencing with Section 13000) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 126.)
-------------------------------------------

14050.3.

“A person in long-term care” means a person who is an inpatient in a medical facility for more than the month of admission who is expected to remain for the full month after the month of admission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 126.)
-------------------------------------------

14051.

(a) “Medically needy person” means any of the following:

(1) An aged, blind, or disabled person who meets the definition of aged, blind, or disabled under the Supplemental Security Income program and whose income and resources are insufficient to provide for the costs of health care or coverage.

(2) A child in foster care for whom public agencies are assuming financial responsibility, in whole or in part, or a person receiving aid under Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4.

(3) A child who is eligible to receive Medi-Cal benefits pursuant to interstate agreements for adoption assistance and related services and
 benefits entered into under Chapter 2.6 (commencing with Section 16170) of Part 4, to the extent federal financial participation is available.

(b) “Medically needy family person” means a parent or caretaker relative of a child or a child under 21 years of age or a pregnant woman of any age with a confirmed pregnancy, exclusive of those persons specified in subdivision (a), whose income and resources are insufficient to provide for the costs of health care or coverage.
